Maine, session 132, LD1543.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA c. 335 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 335
MAINE GREEN SCHOOLS NETWORK
§9931. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Green school. "Green school" means a public school that shows exemplary progress
in the following areas:
A. Supporting the work of school administrative units to increase efficiencies in and
reduce carbon emissions from buildings, energy systems, transportation, food use and
landscaping;
B. Constructing an engaging support system and framework for environmental literacy
through networking and sharing curriculum units, projects and outdoor activities
between educators in this State;
C. Establishing a continuous pathway for career exploration and skill development in
climate-ready fields; and
D. Building strong and lasting leadership within youth, educators, administrators and
community members to support the initiatives described in this subsection.
For the purposes of this subsection, "climate-ready fields" means occupational fields
related to climate or clean energy.
2. Network. "Network" means the Maine Green Schools Network.
Page 1 - 132LR0808(03)

3. Student. "Student" means an individual enrolled in prekindergarten to grade 12 in a
public school or school administrative unit.
§9932. Network established; administration; composition
The Maine Green Schools Network is established within the department to support
environmental education and initiatives within public schools and school administrative
units as described in section 9933.
1. Administration. The department shall administer the network. In administering the
network, the department may collaborate with the following entities:
A. A nonprofit organization in this State that supports environmental awareness,
accountability and action through fostering youth leadership, supporting educators,
prioritizing research and evaluation, shifting culture and advancing transformational
policy;
B. Other state agencies;
C. Tribal governments; and
D. Nonprofit organizations that support environmental, outdoor and climate learning
programs, traditional ecological knowledge, local procurement and other experiential
learning initiatives in public schools and school administrative units.
2. Network composition. The department may, subject to availability of funds, invite
the following individuals to participate in the network:
A. The director of green schools within the department;
B. The climate education specialist within the department;
C. The Wabanaki studies specialist within the department;
D. One educator with experience teaching in a public elementary or secondary school
in the State;
E. One school administrator employed at a school administrative unit in the State;
F. A member of the public;
G. A representative from a climate education nonprofit organization;
H. A representative from a career and technical school;
I. A representative from the Governor's Office of Policy Innovation and the Future
with expertise in youth engagement or climate education; and
J. A representative from the Department of Environmental Protection.
The department may invite additional individuals or organizations to participate in the
network.
§9933. Network duties and other activities
The following provisions govern the network's duties and authority under this chapter.
1. Duties. The network shall:
A. Assist with transportation of students to and from environmentally focused
activities;
Page 2 - 132LR0808(03)

B. Support school projects that incorporate traditional ecological knowledge and best
practices for one or more of the following:
(1) Waste management and recycling;
(2) Energy conservation;
(3) Water conservation;
(4) Schoolyard habitats;
(5) Outdoor classrooms;
(6) Transportation; and
(7) Health;
C. Support professional development;
D. Increase the number of educators in the State who provide training to support the
development of green schools and assist schools with becoming green schools;
E. Develop common resources, trainings and metrics to support educators; and
F. Create a statewide community of practice among educators and administrators for
the purpose of sharing curricula, instruction and assessment practices related to
community resilience and changing ecosystems.
2. Department authorized to develop grant program. The department may develop
a program to offer grants through the network to support initiatives consistent with the
network's duties as described in subsection 1. The department may receive support for any
grant program developed by the department consistent with this subsection from a
nonprofit organization in the State that supports environmental awareness, accountability
and action through fostering youth leadership, supporting educators, prioritizing research
and evaluation, shifting culture and advancing transformational policy. Any revenues
received by and due to the department from all sources other than state appropriation must
be retained by the department and must be used in such a manner as the department
determines consistent with this chapter or as otherwise provided by law or by the terms and
conditions of any gift, grant, devise, bequest, trust or security document.
Sec. 2. Maine Green Schools Network to report to Legislature in 2026. The
Maine Green Schools Network, established in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A,
section 9932 shall issue a report, including any recommendations developed by the network
for new legislation necessary to achieve the goals of the network to the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over education matters by November 4,
2026. The report must contain an update on the status of the following:
1. The schools represented within the network;
2. The schools supported by the network; and
3. The number of counties participating in the network.
The committee may report out legislation based on the report to the 133rd Legislature
in 2027.
Page 3 - 132LR0808(03)